New Jersey, session 222, A4442.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Human Services shall provide informational posters or other signage, containing information on the precautions a SNAP recipient can take to avoid falling victim to fraudulent methods used by individuals to steal SNAP benefits, including, but not limited to, information on locking and unlocking the recipients electronic benefits transfer card, to every authorized New Jersey SNAP retailer. b.  The informational posters or other signage provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be prominently displayed at a conspicuous place on the retailers business premises that is readily accessible to and widely used by SNAP recipients. c.  As used in the section, SNAP means the New Jersey Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, established pursuant to the federal "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008," Pub.L.110-246 (7 U.S.C. s.2011 et seq.) and P.L.1998, c.32 (C.44:10-79 et seq.). 2.  The Department of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.